Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2555.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "dealer" in section 2303 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 2303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Dealer." A person that buys, receives, sells, exchanges, negotiates or solicits the sale, resale, exchange or transfer of domestic animals or dead domestic animals, including over the Internet OR SIMILAR INTERACTIVE COMMUNICATION MEDIA , for the <--123456789101112131415161718 purpose of transfer of ownership or possession to a third party. * * *"Equine infectious anemia test." One of the following:(1) An official agar gel immunodiffusion blood test, conducted by a federally approved laboratory within 12 months prior to the date of entry.(2) An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test, conducted by a federally approved laboratory within 12 months prior to the date of entry.* * *"Interstate certificate of veterinary inspection." As defined in section 2501 (relating to definitions).* * *"Person." An individual or a legally recognized entity.* * *Section 2. Title 3 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2348.1. Requirements for equines sold by dealer.(a) Duty of dealer.--A dealer must comply with the following:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (3), an equine sold by a dealer must have tested negative to an equine infectious anemia test, and proof of the negative result shall accompany the equine.(2) A dealer may use an interstate certificate of veterinary inspection, MUST DETERMINE WHETHER AN EQUINE HAS AN implanted microchip or tattoo or brand. (3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a foal under the age of six months which is accompanied by the dam which had a negative equine infectious anemia test.(b) Required recordkeeping.--For a minimum of two years 20260HB2555PN3560 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following the date of sale, for each equine sold by a dealer, a dealer shall maintain the following records:(1) The presence or absence of a microchip, tattoo or brand, including, if present, any identification number contained in the microchip and, if present, a detailed description or photograph of any tattoo or brand found on the equine.(2) The date and time that each equine was sold by a dealer.(3) A copy of proof of equine infectious anemia test. For any equine infectious anemia test collected outside of this Commonwealth, a copy of an interstate certificate of veterinary inspection must accompany the equine infectious anemia test.(4) Any other documentation that the department may require by regulation.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dam." The mother or female parent of a horse."Foal." A young equine under the age of one.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2555PN3560 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122